Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 3 Pain Management Clinics
63-1-316. Pain management clinic license.

On or after July 1, 2017, no person shall own or operate a pain management clinic unless the medical director obtains a license from the department. No license shall be issued unless the pain management clinic has been inspected and found to be in compliance with this part by the department. The department is authorized to charge a reasonable fee for any application for a license.

Every medical director of a pain management clinic in this state shall receive from the department a pain management clinic license. Notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, the department shall establish a system of license renewals at intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under this section are valid for twenty-four (24) months and expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the department determines that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under this section for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportional to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

In order to transition regulation of pain management clinics to a system of licensure, the department is authorized to require the licensure of a clinic with a certificate holder under this part on the date of the expiration of the certificate. The pain management clinic may continue to operate until the certificate expires, and the certificate shall be deemed to be a license under this part until it expires. On the expiration of the certificate, the clinic may seek an initial licensure under this section.

The department shall inspect each pain management clinic a minimum of once every two (2) years to ensure compliance with this part. The department shall not refuse license renewal based solely upon failure of the department to inspect a pain management clinic as required by this subsection (c).

Any medical director, in order to lawfully establish, conduct, operate, or maintain a pain management clinic shall obtain a license from the department in the following manner:

The medical director shall submit an application on a form to be prepared by the department, showing that the medical director is of good moral character and able to comply with the minimum standards for a pain management clinic and with rules lawfully promulgated under this part. The medical director shall also submit any required fees. The application shall contain the following additional information:

The name or names of all owners;

The location of the pain management clinic;

The name of the medical director, and the identification of any other license or application related to a pain management clinic with which the medical director is associated;

The names and Tennessee license numbers for any employees of the clinics or other persons with whom the clinic has contracted for services;

Whether any owner, employee, or person with whom the clinic contracts has been convicted of any felony; is under indictment for any offense involving the sale, diversion, or dispensing of controlled substances under state or federal law; or has had any license issued by any jurisdiction, under which the person may prescribe, dispense, administer, supply, or sell a controlled substance, restricted, disciplined, or denied; and

Other information as the department may reasonably require;

If the commissioner determines that a license for any pain management clinic will not be granted in accordance with this section, the commissioner shall notify the applicant; and

If the commissioner finds that the applicant complies with this part and the rules promulgated under this part, then the commissioner may recommend and approve the issuance of a license, and a license may be issued by the department licensing the applicant to operate the pain management clinic.

The commissioner shall promulgate by rule additional licensure requirements that define appropriate health and safety standards necessary to protect the health and welfare of residents.

The commissioner shall promulgate by rule additional financial requirements, such as bonds or liability insurance, to be required of pain management clinics.

Each license to operate a pain management clinic shall expire as provided in subsection (b) and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. A licensee may renew its license within sixty (60) days following the license expiration date upon payment of the renewal fee in addition to a late penalty established by the commissioner for each month or fraction of a month that payment for renewal is late. A late penalty shall not exceed twice the renewal fee. If a licensee fails to renew its license within sixty (60) days following the license expiration date, the licensee shall reapply for licensure in accordance with the rules established by the commissioner and shall cease operation of the clinic until such time as the clinic is duly licensed. A license shall not be assignable or transferable, shall be issued only for the location named in the application, shall be posted in a conspicuous place in the pain management clinic, and may be renewed as provided in this part.

The commissioner may deny, suspend, revoke, or otherwise discipline or restrict the license issued under this part on any of the following grounds:

A violation of this part or of the rules promulgated pursuant to this part;

The permitting, aiding, or abetting the commission of any illegal act in the pain management clinic;

A license issued in error;

Any conduct or practice found by the commissioner to be detrimental to the welfare of the patients in the pain management clinic;

A conviction of any employee of the clinic for an offense involving the sale, diversion, or dispensing of controlled substances under state or federal law related to the operation of the clinic;

Any owner has been convicted of, pled nolo contendere to, or received deferred adjudication for an offense that constitutes a felony;

Any owner or employee or person who otherwise provides services in the clinic or contracts with the clinic has ever been denied, by any jurisdiction, a license under which the person may prescribe, dispense, administer, supply, or sell a controlled substance;

Any owner or employee or person who otherwise provides services in the clinic or contracts with the clinic has ever held a license issued by any jurisdiction, under which the person may prescribe, dispense, administer, supply, or sell a controlled substance, that has been restricted; and

Any owner or employee or person who otherwise provides services in the clinic or contracts with the clinic has ever been subject to disciplinary action by any licensing entity for conduct that was the result of inappropriately prescribing, dispensing, administering, supplying, or selling a controlled substance.

The commissioner may, after a hearing, hold the case under advisement and make a recommendation as to requirements to be met by the pain management clinic in order to avoid suspension, revocation, or other discipline of a license or suspension of admissions.

The commissioner may promulgate rules defining the sanction structure and associated penalties.

The hearing to deny a license, suspend a license, revoke a license, place a pain management clinic on probation, or impose any other sanction, and judicial review of the commissioner's decision, shall be in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (UAPA), compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and shall include the right to appeal and judicial review under the UAPA.

On or after July 1, 2017, no owner of a pain management clinic shall locate or participate in locating a pharmacy, as defined in § 63-10-204, in which any owner has an ownership interest, in a location that is adjacent to the location of the clinic. Locating a pharmacy in which any owner of a pain management clinic has an ownership interest adjacent to the clinic shall result in the revocation of the license to operate the pain management clinic.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act rules as are necessary to set fees for licensure, renewal of licensure, late renewal fees, and other fees.

Any licensee or applicant for a license aggrieved by a decision or action of the department or commissioner pursuant to this part may request a hearing before the commissioner.

Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 18. July 1, 2017; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 28, 2016.

63-1-317. Unlawful operation of pain management clinic — Investigation — Injunctive relief — Civil penalty.

An entity or person who operates a pain management clinic without obtaining a license pursuant to this part commits a Class A misdemeanor. Each day of operation without a license constitutes a separate offense.

The commissioner of health may authorize an investigation of any person or entity to the extent necessary to determine if the person or entity is engaged in the unlawful operation of a pain management clinic.

The commissioner may, through the office of the attorney general and reporter, apply for injunctive relief in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any person from committing an act in violation of this part. Injunctive proceedings are in addition to, and not in lieu of, all penalties and other remedies prescribed in this part.

A person who aids or requires another person to violate this part or rules promulgated pursuant to this part, who permits a license issued by the commissioner to be used by any person other than the licensee, or who acts to violate or evade this part or rules promulgated pursuant to this part is subject to a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. Each day in violation of this part constitutes a separate violation.

Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 18. July 1, 2017; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 28, 2016.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-1-318. Suspension of treatment — Transition plan — Notice — Corrective action plan — Special monitor.

In those cases where the conditions of any pain management clinic are, or are likely to be, detrimental to the health, safety, or welfare of any patient, the commissioner of health has the authority to suspend treatment of any new or existing patients to the clinic pending a prompt hearing before an administrative judge.

In the event a suspension under this section affects existing patients, the pain management clinic shall provide written notice and other appropriate notice to patients. The pain management clinic shall develop a transition plan to maintain continuity of care for the patients and to minimize the impact of transition to alternative care arrangements. The plan shall be developed in conjunction with the department. The pain management clinic shall assist each patient in locating an alternative placement or treatment resource, which shall be specified in the transition plan. The transition plan shall also include the most recent version of the patient's plan of care. The commissioner may promulgate rules specifying additional components of the transition plan in accordance with this part.

The commissioner is authorized to withdraw the suspension of treatment at any time prior to a hearing, based on information presented to the commissioner showing that such conditions have been and will continue to remain corrected.

Whenever the commissioner suspends the treatment of any new patients, the commissioner shall detail, in a notice to the clinic, the specific violations causing the suspension. The notice shall be prominently posted at the clinic so as to be readily available to the public.

The notice shall detail what conditions are considered detrimental to the health, safety, or welfare of the patients.

Within ten (10) days of receiving the notice described in subsection (d), a pain management clinic shall submit a corrective action plan to the commissioner delineating the measures to be taken to address violations and associated time frames. If it is deemed by the commissioner to be necessary to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of clinic patients, the commissioner may require the clinic to take all necessary actions to correct violations immediately.

If the clinic complies with the conditions described in subsection (e), the commissioner may lift the suspension, unless other conditions exist that warrant an additional suspension or continuation of the suspension. The commissioner has the authority to:

Continue or modify the suspension of treatment;

Withdraw the suspension of treatment;

Suspend or condition the license of the clinic; and

Enter other orders as the commissioner deems necessary.

During a suspension of treatment pursuant to this section, the commissioner may appoint one (1) or more special monitors, if the deficiency threatens serious harm to the patients of the clinic. The commissioner may appoint a special monitor or monitors at any other time, if the commissioner has reason to believe that deficiencies exist in a clinic that are detrimental to the direct care of the patients. Whenever the appointment of monitors is utilized pursuant to this section, the commissioner shall appoint a sufficient number of monitors to ensure their presence in the clinic for a minimum of twenty (20) hours per week. The monitors shall observe the operation of the clinic and shall submit written reports periodically to the commissioner on the operation of the clinic. Persons appointed as monitors shall be duly qualified to discharge their responsibilities. While employed as monitors, they shall represent the department with the power to observe and review all of the clinic's operation, with attention to those aspects for which the suspension of admission was imposed. When appointment of a monitor or monitors is mandated by this section, the clinic shall be liable for the costs of the special monitors, until it has been determined that the deficiencies have been corrected. The commissioner may retain a monitor in a clinic after acceptance of a correction plan and issuance of compliance to evaluate the clinic's continued compliance, but such continued monitoring shall be at the expense of the department. The costs of the monitors for which a clinic is responsible shall be recoverable as follows:

Addition of such costs to the clinic's licensing fee, the renewal of the clinic's license to be contingent upon the prior payment of the costs; or

By suit of the department in the circuit or chancery court of competent jurisdiction to recover the costs.

Judicial review shall be available pursuant to § 4-5-322.

Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 18. July 1, 2017; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 28, 2016.

63-1-319. Annual report by medical director of pain management clinic.

The medical director of each pain management clinic shall report annually to the department of health, on a form promulgated by the department, the following:

The number of physicians, physician assistants, and advanced practice registered nurses who are working in the clinic for each month;

The number of patients seen by the clinic for each month and the number receiving treatment for chronic nonmalignant pain;

Whether the pain management clinic is part of or associated with a hospital; and

Any other information requested by the department.

The department is authorized to promulgate a reporting form concerning such information as the commissioner may reasonably require, and establish the reporting period and dates for submission.

Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 18. July 1, 2017; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 28, 2016.

63-1-320. Providing rules to health committee and health and welfare committee.

Notwithstanding this part or the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, any rule promulgated to implement this part shall be provided to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate by the secretary of state, after approval by the attorney general and reporter, at the same time the text of the rule is made available to the government operations committees of the senate and the house of representatives for purposes of conducting the review required by § 4-5-226 in order for the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate to be afforded the opportunity to comment on the rule.

Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 17.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1033, § 18. July 1, 2017; provided that for the purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on April 28, 2016.